Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that students who participate in dual credit programs have higher rates of college enrollment, persistence, and completion. Dual credit programs are an important economic development for Washington because they equip students with the skills needed for high-skill, high-wage employment and continued education in high-demand sectors.(2) Career and technical education (CTE) dual credit is the most commonly accessed form of dual credit in Washington and has significant potential to improve equitable access to postsecondary pathways for students from all backgrounds. However, it lags behind other course-based dual credit programs in ensuring that students receive a transcripted credit while in high school, and that the credit they earn will transfer to the postsecondary institution of their choice.(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to extend and expand a pilot program for the purpose of increasing CTE dual credit participation and credential attainment in professional technical programs and receive recommendations on future amendments to state dual credit policies.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the college board shall administer, and award grant funding to, a regional pilot program, for the purpose of increasing career and technical education dual credit participation and credential attainment in professional technical programs.(2) The pilot program must be a continuation of the pilot program established in section 601(47)(a), chapter 376, Laws of 2024. This pilot program may receive grant funding for up to two years.(3) Community and technical colleges, public high schools, and skill centers participating in a pilot program may use grant funding to cover expenses for the following activities:(a) Developing, and updating annually, a comprehensive catalog of dual credit courses and programs offered to students enrolled in public high schools;(b) Aligning career and technical education dual credit programs with postsecondary credential pathways and apprenticeships leading to in-demand career fields;(c) Providing technical assistance to public high schools and institutions of higher education to improve the accuracy and speed of awarding dual credits and updating transcripts;(d) Providing professional development for staff of public high schools and institutions of higher education to develop, align, and articulate dual credit courses; and(e) Supporting public high school staff in the following activities:(i) Outreach to prospective students and students who have completed career and technical education dual credit courses and are eligible for postsecondary credit about how to receive and where to apply the credit;(ii) Providing technical assistance in course curriculum alignment for career and technical education dual credit courses;(iii) Partnering with institutions of higher education to develop articulation agreements for career and technical education dual credit courses; and(iv) Awarding equipment and supplies grants for career and technical education dual credit courses that meet emerging needs in high-demand, high-paying industries.(4) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(a) "Public high school" means a public school as defined in RCW 28A.150.010 with any of grades nine through 12; and(b) "Skill centers" refers to the regional career and technical education partnerships established under chapter 28A.245 RCW.(5) This section expires July 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:(1) In compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the college board, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall jointly report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the implementation of this act and with recommendations for additional improvements to state dual credit policies. The preliminary report is due by December 10, 2026, and the final report is due by August 10, 2027.(2) One or both reports must include the following information:(a) Findings regarding the pilot program created for the purpose of increasing career and technical education dual credit participation and credential attainment in professional technical programs under section 2 of this act; and(b) Recommendations to the legislature and relevant state agencies for:(i) Improving career and technical education course articulation and for the development of statewide articulation agreements;(ii) Improving data collection and reporting methods;(iii) Credit transcription and transfer processes;(iv) Ensuring college and career counseling for high school students includes robust and accurate information about dual credit pathways, including career and technical education dual credit, and their alignment to postsecondary credential and apprenticeship opportunities;(v) Further alignment of career and technical education dual credit with career-connected learning, apprenticeship, and credential pathways; and(vi) Identification of additional priority career and technical education dual credit courses for statewide articulation, considering, but not limited to, the targeted industry sectors under RCW 43.330.090.(3) The final report must establish recommendations to improve state career and technical education dual credit policies, create statewide articulation agreements, and improve the uniform transcription of earned credits. These recommendations must include input from a statewide organization representing career and technical education and other relevant interested parties and report on potential statutory changes and administrative rule improvements that support equitable student access to, and the effectiveness of, career and technical education dual credit programs.(4) This section expires July 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2025, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.--- END ---